California statutes. Education Code
(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44925.

The governing board of any school district may employ or engage as an independent contractor a qualified person to serve as limited-term or part-time reader assistant in connection with instruction in composition and writing, and in mathematics, to teachers. Any person employed as a reader shall not be deemed to be employed in a position requiring certification qualifications, and, unless otherwise determined by the governing board, shall not be subject to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 45100) of this part. The governing board may pay such hourly or unit compensation rates as it deems proper for the services rendered. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section not to authorize an increase in the number of pupils who may be assigned to any class, but to provide an opportunity for improvement in the quality of student writing and mathematics abilities through more frequent assignments of compositions and more work in mathematics made possible by the employment of suitably trained persons to assist the instructor in the careful marking and analysis of the pupils’ work. Furthermore, the means adopted for employing persons as reader assistants is not intended as an encroachment upon the merit system of public employment, but is adopted as the most practical arrangement, since most work of such nature will be done as part-time work and in the home.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44926.

The governing board of any school district may employ any qualified person who possesses a temporary certificate to serve as a teacher-assistant in a program conducted in cooperation with a California teacher training institution. No person shall be so employed unless he is enrolled as a student in a cooperating California teacher training institution at the time the service is rendered. Service by a person under a teacher-assistant certificate shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to the attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a permanent employee of a school district. The governing board may make such payments as it deems proper for the services rendered.

Any person employed under this section shall not be subject to the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 22000) to Chapter 27 (commencing with Section 24600), inclusive, of Part 13 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44927.

The governing board of any school district, a county board of education, or the Department of Education may execute a contract with any California teacher-training institution whereby certificated personnel of the school district, county, or the Department of Education may be assigned to the teacher-training institution for full-time or part-time duty for a period not to exceed one year.

Any teacher-training institution in California may execute a contract with the governing board of any school district, a county board of education, or the Board of Education whereby certificated personnel of the institution may be assigned to school districts, county boards of education, or the Department of Education for full-time or part-time duty for a period not to exceed one year.

Any such contract shall provide for the payment, by the entity to which a person is assigned to the employer, of a sum equivalent to the salary and other employment costs of any such employee. In place of such payment, the contract may provide for the exchange of certificated personnel between the district, county, or Department of Education and the teacher-training institution. Any such employee shall retain his status as an employee of the school district, county, Department of Education, or teacher-training institution from which he is assigned in all respects during the period of such assignment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44928.

(a) No school in any school district having an average daily attendance in excess of 250,000 shall have at any time a certificated teaching staff, excluding substitutes employed pursuant to Section 45030, of whom more than 5 percent have only an emergency credential.

(b) This section does not apply to emergency credentials for bilingual education or for education of the learning handicapped, severely handicapped, physically handicapped, or to any other emergency credential established for the purposes of special education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 920, Sec. 6.   (SB 913)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

44929.

Whenever the governing board of a school district or a county office of education, by formal action, determines that because of impending curtailment of or changes in the manner of performing services, the best interests of the district or county office of education would be served by encouraging the retirement of certificated employees and that the retirement will result in a net savings to the district or county office of education, an additional two years of service shall be credited under the Defined Benefit Program of the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan to a certificated employee pursuant to Section 22714 if all of the conditions set forth in that section are satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 313, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Permanent Status [44929.20. - 44929.29.]

44929.20.

Every certificated employee of a school district of any type or class having an average daily attendance of less than 250, and every certificated employee of any school district in a position requiring a supervision or administration credential, may be offered a continuing contract to cover a period longer than one year but not to exceed four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

44929.21.

(a) Every employee of a school district of any type or class having an average daily attendance of 250 or more who, after having been employed by the district for three complete consecutive school years in a position or positions requiring certification qualifications, is reelected for the next succeeding school year to a position requiring certification qualifications shall, at the commencement of the succeeding school year be classified as and become a permanent employee of the district.

This subdivision shall apply only to probationary employees whose probationary period commenced prior to the 1983–84 fiscal year.

(b) Every employee of a school district of any type or class having an average daily attendance of 250 or more who, after having been employed by the district for two complete consecutive school years in a position or positions requiring certification qualifications, is reelected for the next succeeding school year to a position requiring certification qualifications shall, at the commencement of the succeeding school year be classified as and become a permanent employee of the district.

The governing board shall notify the employee, on or before March 15 of the employee’s second complete consecutive school year of employment by the district in a position or positions requiring certification qualifications, of the decision to reelect or not reelect the employee for the next succeeding school year to the position. In the event that the governing board does not give notice pursuant to this section on or before March 15, the employee shall be deemed reelected for the next succeeding school year.

This subdivision shall apply only to probationary employees whose probationary period commenced during the 1983–84 fiscal year or any fiscal year thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

44929.22.

At the discretion of the governing board of a district with 60,000 average daily attendance or more every employee of the district who, after having been employed by the district for two consecutive school years in a position or positions requiring certification qualifications, is reelected for the next succeeding school year to a position requiring certification qualifications may, at the commencement of the succeeding school year, be classified as and become a permanent employee of the district. If the board is the governing board of more than one district, it may exercise the discretionary power given it by this section in each district under its jurisdiction, whether or not each of the districts has 60,000 average daily attendance.

This section shall apply only to probationary employees whose probationary period commenced prior to the 1983–84 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

44929.23.

(a) The governing board of a school district of any type or class having an average daily attendance of less than 250 pupils may classify as a permanent employee of the district any employee who, after having been employed by the school district for three complete consecutive school years in a position or positions requiring certification qualifications, is reelected for the next succeeding school year to a position requiring certification qualifications. If that classification is not made, the employee shall not attain permanent status and may be reelected from year to year thereafter without becoming a permanent employee until a change in classification is made.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), Section 44929.21 shall apply to certificated employees employed by a school district, if the governing board of the school district elects to dismiss probationary employees pursuant to Section 44948.2. If that election is made, the governing board thereafter shall classify as a permanent employee of the district any probationary employee who, after being employed for two complete consecutive school years in a position or positions requiring certification qualifications, is reelected for the next succeeding school year to a position requiring certification qualifications as required by Section 44929.21. Any probationary employee who has been employed by the district for two or more consecutive years on the date of that election in a position or positions requiring certification qualifications shall be classified as a permanent employee of the district.

(c) If the classification is not made pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the employee shall not attain permanent status and may be reelected from year to year thereafter without becoming a permanent employee until the classification is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 106.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

44929.25.

When a teacher of classes for adults serves sufficient probationary time as provided in Sections 44929.20 to 44929.23, inclusive, and Section 44908 to be eligible for election to permanent classification in that district, his or her tenure shall be for the service equivalent to the average number of hours per week that he or she has served during his or her probationary years. In no case shall the employee be classified as permanent for more than one full-time assignment. The service for which the person has acquired tenure may be reduced in conformity with Sections 44955 and 44956.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, in a district that has, or in a district that is one of two or more districts governed by governing boards of identical personnel that have a combined average daily attendance of 400,000 or more, as shown by the annual report of the county superintendent of schools for the preceding fiscal year, no person who is assigned 10 hours or less a week in adult classes in the district shall be eligible for election to permanent classification in the district on account of the assignment in adult classes.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, any person who is employed to teach adults for not more than 60 percent of the hours per week considered a full-time assignment for permanent employees having comparable duties shall be classified as a temporary employee, and shall not become a probationary employee under the provisions of Section 44954.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

44929.26.

Nothing in Sections 44929.20 to 44929.23, inclusive, shall be construed to give permanent classification to a person in the adult school who is already classified as a permanent employee in the day school. In case a teacher obtains permanent classification in the evening school and later is eligible for the same classification in the day school by reason of having served the probationary period therein, he or she shall be given his or her choice as to which he or she shall take.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, service in the evening school shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a permanent employee in the day school, except service in the evening school rendered by a person rendering services in the day school who is directed or specifically requested by the school district to render services in the evening school either in addition to, or instead of, rendering service in the day school. Service in the day school shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite to attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a permanent employee in the evening school, except service in the day school rendered by a person rendering services in the evening school who is directed or specifically requested by the school district to render service in the day school either in addition to, or instead of, rendering service in the evening school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

44929.27.

No employee of a school district or districts, in which the average daily attendance of all the districts combined is in excess of 200,000, governed by the same governing board shall hereafter acquire permanent certificated tenure or permanent noncertificated status, or a combination of tenure and status, for more than one full-time position. Any employee who hereafter acquires any combination of permanent certificated tenure or permanent noncertificated status or both which exceeds that for one full-time position shall have a choice which tenure or status to retain so long as that retained does not exceed one full-time position.

It is the intent of this section that an employee holding permanent certificated tenure or permanent noncertificated status for a full-time position may not have permanent tenure or status protection for any additional time in either a certificated or a noncertificated position under any such school district governed by the same governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

44929.28.

The governing board of a school district that employs in a position requiring certification qualifications any person who has become a permanent certificated employee in any school district may employ that person as a permanent certificated employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

44929.29.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as affecting the classification of any employee as it existed on September 13, 1941.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 380.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Resignations, Dismissals, and Leaves of Absence [44930. - 44988.]

44930.

(a) Governing boards of school districts shall accept the resignation of any employee and shall fix the time when the resignation takes effect, which, except as provided by subdivision (b), shall not be later than the close of the school year during which the resignation has been received by the board.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an employee and the governing board of a school district may agree that a resignation will be accepted at a mutually agreed upon date not later than two years beyond the close of the school year during which the resignation is received by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 80, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

44931.

Whenever any certificated employee of any school district who, at the time of his or her resignation, was classified as permanent, is reemployed within 39 months after his or her last day of paid service, the governing board of the district shall, disregarding the break in service, classify him or her as, and restore to him or her all of the rights, benefits and burdens of, a permanent employee, except as otherwise provided in this code. However, time spent in active military service, as defined in Section 44800, subsequent to the last day of paid service shall not count as part of the aforesaid 39-month period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 94.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44932.

(a) A permanent employee shall not be dismissed except for one or more of the following causes:

(1) Immoral conduct, including, but not limited to, egregious misconduct. For purposes of this chapter, “egregious misconduct” is defined exclusively as immoral conduct that is the basis for an offense described in Section 44010 or 44011 of this code, or in Sections 11165.2 to 11165.6, inclusive, of the Penal Code.

(2) Unprofessional conduct.

(3) Commission, aiding, or advocating the commission of acts of criminal syndicalism, as prohibited by Chapter 188 of the Statutes of 1919, or in any amendment to
 that chapter.

(4) Dishonesty.

(5) Unsatisfactory performance.

(6) Evident unfitness for service.

(7) Physical or mental condition unfitting him or her to instruct or associate with children.

(8) Persistent violation of or refusal to obey the school laws of the state or reasonable regulations prescribed for the government of the public schools by the state board or by the governing board of the school district employing him or her.

(9) Conviction of a felony or of any crime involving moral turpitude.

(10) Violation of Section 51530 or conduct specified in Section
 1028 of the Government Code, added by Chapter 1418 of the Statutes of 1947.

(11) Alcoholism or other drug abuse that makes the employee unfit to instruct or associate with children.

(b) The governing board of a school district may suspend without pay for a specific period of time on grounds of unprofessional conduct a permanent certificated employee or, in a school district with an average daily attendance of less than 250 pupils, a probationary employee, pursuant to the procedures specified in Sections 44933, 44934, 44934.1, 44935, 44936, 44937, 44943, and 44944. This authorization does not apply to a school district that has adopted a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3543.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 86.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

44933.

A permanent employee may be dismissed or suspended on grounds of unprofessional conduct consisting of acts or omissions other than those specified in Section 44932, but any such charge shall specify instances of behavior deemed to constitute unprofessional conduct. This section shall also apply to the suspension of probationary employees in a school district with an average daily attendance of less than 250 pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 52.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

44934.

(a) This section shall apply to dismissal or suspension proceedings based on charges as specified in Section 44932 or 44933, including proceedings based on charges of egregious misconduct in combination with other charges. Section 44934.1 shall apply to dismissal or suspension proceedings based solely on charges of egregious misconduct described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932.

(b) Upon the filing of written charges, duly signed and verified by the person filing them, with the governing board of the school district, or upon a written statement of charges formulated by the governing board of the school district, charging that there exists cause, as specified in
 Section 44932 or 44933, for the dismissal or suspension of a permanent employee of the school district, the governing board of the school district may, upon majority vote, except as provided in this article if it deems the action necessary, give notice to the permanent employee of its intention to dismiss or suspend him or her at the expiration of 30 days from the date of service of the notice, unless the employee demands a hearing as provided in this article. Suspension proceedings may be initiated pursuant to this section only if the governing board of the school district has not adopted a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3543.2 of the Government Code.

(c) Any written statement of charges shall specify instances of behavior and the acts or omissions constituting the charge so that the employee will be able to prepare his or her defense. It shall, where applicable, state the statutes and rules that the
 employee is alleged to have violated, and it shall also set forth the facts relevant to each charge.

(d) If the governing board of the school district has given notice to a certificated employee of its intention to dismiss or suspend him or her, based upon written charges filed or formulated pursuant to this section, the charges may be amended less than 90 days before the hearing on the charges only upon a showing of good cause. If a motion to amend charges is granted by the administrative law judge, the employee shall be given a meaningful opportunity to respond to the amended charges.

(e) A notice of the governing board of the school district to an employee of its intention to dismiss or suspend him or her, together with written charges filed or formulated pursuant to this section, shall be sufficient to initiate a hearing under Section 11503 of the Government Code, and the
 governing board of the school district shall not be required to file or serve a separate accusation.

(f) This section shall also apply to the suspension of probationary employees in a school district with an average daily attendance of less than 250 pupils that has not adopted a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3542.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 55, Sec. 3.   (AB 215)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

44934.1.

(a) This section shall apply only to dismissal or suspension proceedings based solely on charges of egregious misconduct, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932.

(b) Upon the filing of written charges, duly signed and verified by the person filing them, with the governing board of a school district, or upon a written statement of charges formulated by the governing board of a school district charging that there exists cause, as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, for the dismissal or suspension of a permanent employee of the school district, the governing board of the school district may, upon majority vote, except as provided in this article if it
 deems the action necessary, give notice to the permanent employee of its intention to dismiss or suspend him or her at the expiration of 30 days from the date of service of the notice, unless the employee demands a hearing as provided in this article.

(c) Any written statement of charges of egregious misconduct shall specify instances of behavior and the acts or omissions constituting the charge so that the employee will be able to prepare his or her defense. It shall, where applicable, state the statutes and rules that the employee is alleged to have violated, and it shall also set forth the facts relevant to each occasion of alleged egregious misconduct.

(d) This section shall also apply to the suspension of probationary employees in a school district with an average daily attendance of less than 250 pupils that has not adopted a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to
 subdivision (b) of Section 3542.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 55, Sec. 4.   (AB 215)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

44935.

(a) A report on the fitness of a certificated employee in a dismissal or suspension proceeding initiated pursuant to Section 44934 or 44934.1 shall not be received from a statewide professional organization by a governing board unless the certificated employee shall have been given, prior to the preparation of the report in its final form, the opportunity to submit in writing his or her comments on the report and unless a copy of the report in final form is given to the certificated employee investigated at least 10 days prior to its submission to the governing board.

(b) A report shall not be distributed other than to the governing board and those persons participating in its
 preparation, unless the certificated employee does not demand a hearing as provided by Section 44937.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 55, Sec. 5.   (AB 215)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

44936.

(a) The notice of dismissal or suspension in a proceeding initiated pursuant to Section 44934 or 44934.1 may be given at any time of year.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the notice of dismissal or suspension in a proceeding involving only charges of unsatisfactory performance initiated pursuant to Section 44934 shall only be given during the instructional year of the schoolsite where the employee is physically employed. However, a notice of dismissal or suspension in a proceeding involving charges of unsatisfactory performance may be initiated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 44938.

(c) The
 notice of dismissal or suspension given during the instructional year of the schoolsite where the employee is physically employed shall be in writing and be served upon the employee personally or by United States registered mail addressed to him or her at his or her last known address. A copy of the charges filed, containing the information required by Section 11503 of the Government Code, together with a copy of the provisions of this article, shall be attached to the notice.

(d) A notice of dismissal or suspension given outside of the instructional year of the schoolsite where the employee is physically employed shall be in writing and shall be served upon the employee personally. A copy of the charges filed, containing the information required pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code, together with a copy of the provisions of this article, shall be attached to the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 55, Sec. 6.   (AB 215)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

44937.

In a dismissal or suspension proceeding initiated pursuant to Section 44934 or 44934.1, if the employee does not demand a hearing by filing a written request for hearing with the governing board, he or she may be dismissed or suspended without pay for a specific period of time at the expiration of the 30-day period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 55, Sec. 7.   (AB 215)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

44938.

(a) The governing board of any school district shall not act upon any charges of unprofessional conduct unless at least 45 calendar days prior to the date of the filing, the board or its authorized representative has given the employee against whom the charge is filed, written notice of the unprofessional conduct, specifying the nature thereof with such specific instances of behavior and with such particularity as to furnish the employee an opportunity to correct his or her faults and overcome the grounds for the charge. The written notice shall include the evaluation made pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 44660) of Chapter 3, if applicable to the employee.

(b) The governing board of any school district shall not act upon any charges of unsatisfactory performance unless it acts in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (1) or (2):

(1) At least 90 calendar days prior to the date of the filing, the board or its authorized representative has given the employee against whom the charge is filed, written notice of the unsatisfactory performance, specifying the nature thereof with such specific instances of behavior and with such particularity as to furnish the employee an opportunity to correct his or her faults and overcome the grounds for the charge. The written notice shall include the evaluation made pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 44660) of Chapter 3, if applicable to the employee.

(2) The governing board may act during the time period composed of the last one-fourth of the schooldays it has scheduled for purposes of computing apportionments in any fiscal year if, prior to the beginning of that time period, the board or its authorized representative has given the employee against whom the charge is filed, written notice of the unsatisfactory performance, specifying the nature thereof with such specific instances of behavior and with such particularity as to furnish the employee an opportunity to correct his or her faults and overcome the grounds for the charge. The written notice shall include the evaluation made pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 44660) of Chapter 3, if applicable to the employee.

(c) “Unsatisfactory performance” as used in this section means, and refers only to, the unsatisfactory performance particularly specified as a cause for dismissal in Section 44932 and does not include any other cause for dismissal specified in Section 44932.

“Unprofessional conduct” as used in this section means, and refers to, the unprofessional conduct particularly specified as a cause for dismissal or suspension in Sections 44932 and 44933 and does not include any other cause for dismissal specified in Section 44932.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 392, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

44939.

(a) This section applies only to dismissal or suspension proceedings initiated pursuant to Section 44934.

(b) Upon the filing of written charges, duly signed and verified by the person filing them with the governing board of a school district, or upon a written statement of charges formulated by the governing board of a school district, charging a permanent employee of the school district with immoral conduct, conviction of a felony or of any crime involving moral turpitude, with incompetency due to mental disability, with willful refusal to perform regular assignments without reasonable cause, as prescribed by reasonable rules and regulations of the employing school district, or with violation of Section 51530, the
 governing board of the school district may, if it deems that action necessary, immediately suspend the employee from his or her duties and give notice to him or her of his or her suspension, and that 30 days after service of the notice of dismissal, he or she will be dismissed, unless he or she demands a hearing.

(c) (1) An employee who has been placed on suspension pursuant to this section may serve and file with the Office of Administrative Hearings a motion for immediate reversal of suspension. Review of a motion filed pursuant to this section shall be limited to a determination as to whether the facts as alleged in the statement of charges, if true, are sufficient to constitute a basis for immediate suspension under this section. The motion shall include a memorandum of points and authorities setting forth law and argument supporting the employee’s contention that the statement of charges does not set forth a
 sufficient basis for immediate suspension.

(2) The motion shall be served upon the governing board of the school district and filed with the Office of Administrative Hearings within 30 days after service upon the employee of the initial pleading in the matter. The governing board of the school district has the right to serve and file a written response to the motion before or at the time of hearing.

(3) The hearing on the motion for immediate reversal of suspension shall be held no later than 30 days after the motion is filed with the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(4) The administrative law judge shall, no later than 15 days after the hearing, issue an order denying or granting the motion. The order shall be in writing, and a copy of the order shall be served by the Office of Administrative Hearings upon the
 parties. The grant or denial of the motion shall be without prejudice to consideration by the Commission on Professional Competence, based upon the full evidentiary record before it, of the validity of the grounds for dismissal. The ruling shall not be considered by the commission in determining the validity of the grounds for dismissal, and shall not have any bearing on the commission’s determination regarding the grounds for dismissal.

(5) An order granting a motion for immediate reversal of suspension shall become effective within five days of service of the order. The school district shall make the employee whole for any lost wages, benefits, and compensation within 14 days after service of an order granting the motion.

(6) A motion made pursuant to this section shall be the exclusive means of obtaining interlocutory review of suspension pending dismissal. The grant or denial
 of the motion is not subject to interlocutory judicial review.

(d) A motion for immediate reversal of suspension pursuant to this section does not affect the authority of a governing board of a school district to determine the physical placement and assignment of an employee who is suspended or placed on administrative leave during the review of the motion or while dismissal charges are pending.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 87.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

44939.1.

(a) This section shall apply only to dismissal or suspension proceedings initiated pursuant to Section 44934.1.

(b) Upon the filing of written charges, duly signed and verified by the person filing them with the governing board of a school district, or upon a written statement of charges formulated by the governing board of a school district, charging a permanent employee of the school district with egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, the governing board of the school district may, if it deems such action necessary, immediately suspend the employee from his or her duties and give notice to him or her of his or her suspension, and that 30 days after
 service of the notice of dismissal, he or she will be dismissed, unless he or she demands a hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 55, Sec. 9.   (AB 215)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

44939.5.

(a) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools shall not enter into an agreement that would prevent a mandatory report of egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing or any other state or federal agency.

(b) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools shall not expunge from an employee’s personnel file, nor shall they enter into an agreement that would authorize expunging from an employee’s personnel file, credible complaints of, substantiated
 investigations into, or discipline for, egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932. This prohibition does not preclude removing, or entering into an agreement to remove, documents containing allegations that have been the subject of a hearing before an arbitrator, school board, personnel commission, Commission on Professional Competence, or administrative law judge, in which the employee prevailed, the allegations were determined to be false, not credible, or unsubstantiated, or a determination was made that the discipline was not warranted.

(c) (1) A person applying for a certificated position at a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school shall provide that prospective employer with a complete list of every school district, county office of education, charter school, state
 special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, and private school that the applicant has previously been an employee of.

(2) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools considering an applicant for a certificated position shall inquire with each school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school and diagnostic center operated by the department, and private school that previously employed the applicant, as disclosed pursuant to paragraph (1), as to whether the applicant, while previously employed by the school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school was the subject of any credible complaints of, substantiated investigations into, or discipline for, egregious misconduct, as defined in
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, that were required to be reported to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(3) School districts, county offices of education, charter schools, state special schools and diagnostic centers operated by the department, and private schools that have made a report of an employee’s egregious misconduct to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall disclose this fact to a school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school considering an application for employment from the employee, upon inquiry, and, notwithstanding any other law, shall provide the inquiring school district, county office of education, charter school, state special school or diagnostic center operated by the department, or private school with a copy of all relevant information that was reported to the Commission on Teacher
 Credentialing, within its possession.

(d) Any school employee who alleges that another school employee has engaged in egregious misconduct, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, knowing at the time of making the allegation that the allegation was false, shall be subject to certificate revocation, if applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 460, Sec. 12.   (SB 848)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44940.
